Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-101.07
Violations; penalty.

Any lender who violates any of the provisions of section 45-101.05 shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1976, LB 502, § 3;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 39.